Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2054.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 9-19 of the General Laws entitled "Evidence" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following section:
9-19-45. Statements or conduct expressing apology, regret, condolence by health care
provider -- Admissibility.
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Healthcare facility" means any institutional health service provider licensed pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 17 of title 23.
(2) "Healthcare provider" or "provider" shall have the same meaning as the meaning
contained in § 5-37.3-3.
(3) "Relative" means a patient's spouse, parent, grandparent, stepparent, child, grandchild,
brother, sister, half-brother, half-sister, uncle, aunt, adopted children of parent, or spouse's parents,
whether by whole or half blood, adoption or marriage.
(4) "Representative" means a legal guardian, attorney, health care representative or any
person recognized in law or custom as a patient's agent.
(5) "Unanticipated outcome" means the outcome of a medical treatment or procedure that
differs from an expected result of such medical treatment or procedure.
(b) In any claim, complaint or civil action brought against a healthcare facility or provider
by or on behalf of a patient allegedly experiencing an unanticipated outcome, or in any arbitration

proceeding or other method of alternative dispute resolution that relates to the claim, complaint or
civil action, and in any judicial or administrative proceeding against a healthcare facility or
provider, the following shall be inadmissible as evidence of an admission of liability or as evidence
of an admission against interest:
(1) Any and all statements, affirmations, gestures, writings, activities or conduct expressing
apology, benevolence, commiseration, condolence, compassion, sympathy, or a general sense of
concern which are made by a healthcare facility, a healthcare provider, or an employee or agent of
a healthcare facility or provider, to the patient, the patient's relative, or a representative of the patient
which relate to any alleged discomfort, pain, suffering, injury, or death of the patient as a result of
the unanticipated outcome.
(2) This section shall not apply to a statement of fault, liability, negligence, or culpable
conduct that is part of or made in addition to a statement, affirmation, gesture, writing, activity, or
conduct described in subsection (b)(1) of this section, and only the expression of apology,
benevolence, commiseration, condolence, compassion, sympathy, or a general sense of concern
made under subsection (b)(1) of this section is inadmissible.
(3) Any statement, affirmation, gesture, writing, activity, or conduct described in
subsection (b)(1) of this section is admissible for any other purpose.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003658/SUB A
========
LC003658/SUB A - Page 2 of 3